Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-320.02
Flood control; acquisition of lands, rights-of-way, and easements; procedure.

In any county, such as described in section 23-320.01, where it is necessary as a condition to the construction of any flood control works or other similar projects as provided in sections 23-320.01 to 23-320.07, that the county furnish the necessary lands, rights-of-way, or easements therefor, the county board is hereby authorized and empowered to acquire such lands, rights-of-way, or easements as may be necessary, and the board is hereby authorized and empowered to acquire the same by purchase or by gift or by the exercise of the right of eminent domain whether the property be within the limits of such county or outside its boundaries. The procedure to condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724.

Laws 1947, c. 77, § 2, p. 242;

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 68, p. 478;

Laws 1961, c. 89, § 2, p. 311;

Laws 1969, c. 155, § 1, p. 726;

Laws 1981, LB 326, § 13.

Acquisition by city of easements and right-of-way for flood control project was authorized. Gruntorad v. Hughes Bros., 161 Neb. 358, 73 N.W.2d 700 (1955).